California statutes. Penal Code
(3) The applicant had not been found to be an unfit parent in any court proceeding. An inmate applicant whose child has been declared a dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be admitted to the program only after the court has found that participation in the program is in the child’s best interest and that it meets the needs of the parent and child pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 361.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The fact that an inmate
 applicant’s child has been found to come within Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not, in and of itself, be grounds for denying the applicant the opportunity to participate in the program.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall deny placement in the community treatment program if it determines that an inmate would pose an unreasonable risk to the public, or if any one of the following factors exist, except in unusual circumstances or if mitigating circumstances exist, including, but not limited to, the remoteness in time of the commission of the offense:

(1) The inmate has been convicted of any of the following:

(A) A sex offense listed in Section 667.6.

(B) A sex offense requiring registration pursuant to
 Section 290.

(C) A violent offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, except that the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall consider an inmate for placement in the community treatment program on a case-by-case basis if the violent offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 was for robbery pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 or burglary pursuant to paragraph (21) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(D) Arson as defined in Sections 450 to 455, inclusive.

(2) There is probability the inmate may abscond from the program as evidenced by any of the following:

(A) A conviction of escape, of aiding another person to escape, or of an attempt to escape from a jail or prison.

(B) The presence of an active detainer from a law enforcement agency, unless the detainer is based solely upon warrants issued for failure to appear on misdemeanor Vehicle Code violations.

(3) It is probable the inmate’s conduct in a community facility will be adverse to herself or other participants in the program, as determined by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or as evidenced by any of the following:

(A) The inmate’s removal from a community program which resulted from violation of state laws, rules, or regulations governing Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s inmates.

(B) A finding of the inmate’s guilt of a serious rule violation, as defined by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation, which resulted in a credit loss on one occasion of 91 or more days or in a credit loss on more than one occasion of 31 days or more and the credit has not been restored.

(C) A current written opinion of a staff physician or psychiatrist that the inmate’s medical or psychiatric condition is likely to cause an adverse effect upon the inmate or upon other persons if the inmate is placed in the program.

(c) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall consider the placement of the following inmates in the community treatment program on a case-by-case basis: 

(1) An inmate convicted of the unlawful sale or possession for sale, manufacture, or transportation of controlled substances, as defined in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11350) of Division 10 of
 the Health and Safety Code, if large scale for profit as defined by the department, provided that an inmate convicted pursuant to Section 11358 or 11359 of the Health and Safety Code shall be admitted to the program pursuant to subdivision (a). 

(2) An inmate with a United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement hold. 

(d) A charged offense that did not result in a conviction shall not be used to exclude an applicant from the program. 

(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit the discretion of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to deny or approve placement when subdivision (b) does not apply.

(f) The Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation shall determine if the applicant meets the requirements of this section within 30 days of the parent’s application to the program. The department shall establish an appeal procedure for the applicant to appeal an adverse decision by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 71.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3418.

(a) In the case of any inmate who gave birth to a child after the date of sentencing, and in the case of any inmate who gave birth to a child prior to that date and meets the requirements of Section 3417 but has not yet made application for admission to a program, the department shall, at the earliest possible date, but in no case later than the birth of the child, or the receipt of the inmate to the custody of the Department of Corrections, as the case may be, notify the inmate of the provisions of this chapter and provide her with a written application for the program described in this chapter.

(b) The notice provided by the department shall contain, but need not be limited to, guidelines for qualification for, and the timeframe for application to, the program and the process for appealing a denial of admittance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 297, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3419.

(a) In the case of any inmate who gives birth after her receipt by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the department shall, subject to reasonable rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 3414, provide notice of, and a written application for, the program described in this chapter, and upon her request, declare the inmate eligible to participate in a program pursuant to this chapter if all of the requirements of Section 3417 are met.

(b) The notice provided by the department shall contain, but need not be limited to, guidelines for qualification for, and the timeframe for application to, the program and the process for appealing a denial of admittance.

(c) Any community treatment program, in which an inmate who gives birth after her receipt by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation participates, shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Prenatal care.

(2) Access to prenatal vitamins.

(3) Childbirth education.

(4) Infant care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 608, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3420.

(a) Within five days after the receipt of an inmate by the Department of Corrections who has already applied for admission to a program, or of her application for admission to a program, whichever is later, the department shall give notice of her application to the child’s current caretaker or guardian, if any, and if it has not already been notified pursuant to Section 3415, the appropriate local social services agency that conducts investigations for child neglect and dependency hearings.

(b) The department and the individuals and agencies notified shall have five days from the date of notice to decide whether or not to challenge the appropriateness of the applicant’s entry into the program. Lack of a petition filed by that time shall result in a presumption that the individuals and agencies notified do not challenge the appropriateness of the applicant’s entry into the program.

(c) The local agency which has been notified pursuant to Section 3415 shall not initiate the process of considering whether or not to file until after the sentencing court has sentenced the applicant.

(d) The appropriate local agency that conducts investigations for child neglect and dependency hearings, the Department of Corrections, and the current guardian or caretaker of the child, shall have the authority to file for a fitness proceeding against the mother after the mother has applied in writing to participate in the program.

(e) The determination of whether or not to file shall be based in part on the likelihood of the mother being a fit parent for the child in question both during the program and afterwards. Program content shall be taken into account in this determination. There shall be a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence in favor of filing for a fitness proceeding under the following circumstances:

(1) The applicant was convicted of one or more of the following violent felonies:

(A) Murder.

(B) Mayhem.

(C) Aggravated mayhem.

(D) Kidnapping as defined in Section 207 or 209.

(E) Lewd acts on a child under 14 as defined in Section 288.

(F) Any felony in which the defendant inflicts great bodily injury on a person other than accomplices which has been alleged and proven.

(G) Forcible rape in violation of subdivision (2), (3), or (4) of Section 261.

(H) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily injury.

(I) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily injury.

(2) The applicant was convicted of child abuse in the current or any proceeding.

(f) Fitness petitions shall be resolved in the court of first instance as soon as possible for purposes of this section. Given the need to place the child as soon as possible, the first determination by the court as to the applicant’s fitness as a mother shall determine her eligibility for the program for the current application. Outcomes of appeals shall not affect eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 224, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3421.

Children of women inmates may only participate in the program until they reach the age of six years, at which time the Board of Prison Terms may arrange for their care elsewhere under any procedure authorized by statute and transfer the mother to another placement under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections if necessary; and provided further, that at its discretion in exceptional cases, including, but not limited to cases where the mother’s period of incarceration is extended, the board may retain such child and mother for a longer period of time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 11.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

3422.

The costs for care of any mother and child placed in a community treatment program pursuant to this section shall be paid for out of funds allocated to the department in the normal budgetary process. The department shall make diligent efforts to procure other funding sources for the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 12.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.

Any woman inmate who would give birth to a child during her term of imprisonment may be temporarily taken to a hospital outside the prison for the purposes of childbirth, and the charge for hospital and medical care shall be charged against the funds allocated to the institution. The inmate shall not be shackled by the wrists, ankles, or both during labor, including during transport to a hospital, during delivery, and while in recovery after giving birth, except as provided in Section 5007.7. The board shall provide for the care of any children so born and shall pay for their care until suitably placed, including, but not limited to, placement in a community treatment program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 608, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3424.

A woman who is pregnant during her incarceration and who is not eligible for the program described in this chapter shall have access to complete prenatal health care. The department shall establish minimum standards for pregnant inmates in its custody who are not placed in a community treatment program including all of the following:

(a) A balanced, nutritious diet approved by a doctor.

(b) Prenatal and postpartum information and health care, including, but not limited to, access to necessary vitamins as recommended by a doctor.

(c) Information pertaining to childbirth education and infant care.

(d) A dental cleaning while in a state facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 608, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Gender Responsive Programs [3430. - 3430.]

3430.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall do all of the following:

(a) Create a Female Offender Reform Master Plan, and shall present this plan to the Legislature by March 1, 2008.

(b) Create policies and operational practices that are designed to ensure a safe and productive institutional environment for female offenders.

(c) Contract with nationally recognized gender responsive experts in prison operational practices staffing, classification, substance abuse, trauma treatment services, mental health services, transitional services, and community corrections to do both of the following:

(1) Conduct a staffing analysis of all current job classifications assigned to each prison that houses only females. The department shall provide a plan to the Legislature by March 1, 2009, that incorporates those recommendations and details the changes that are needed to address any identified unmet needs of female inmates.

(2) Develop programs and training for department staff in correctional facilities.

(d) Create a gender responsive female classification system.

(e) Create a gender responsive staffing pattern for female institutions and community-based offender beds.

(f) Create a needs-based case and risk management tool designed specifically for female offenders. This tool shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment upon intake, and annually thereafter, that gauges an inmate’s educational and vocational needs, including reading, writing, communication, and arithmetic skills, health care needs, mental health needs, substance abuse needs, and trauma-treatment needs. The initial assessment shall include projections for academic, vocational, health care, mental health, substance abuse, and trauma-treatment needs, and shall be used to determine appropriate programming and as a measure of progress in subsequent assessments of development.

(g) Design and implement evidence-based gender specific rehabilitative programs, including “wraparound” educational, health care, mental health, vocational, substance abuse and trauma treatment programs that are designed to reduce female offender recidivism. These programs shall include, but not be limited to, educational programs that include academic preparation in the areas of verbal communication skills, reading, writing, arithmetic, and the acquisition of high school diplomas and GEDs, and vocational preparation, including counseling and training in marketable skills, and job placement information.

(h) Build and strengthen systems of family support and family involvement during the period of the female’s incarceration.

(i) Establish a family service coordinator at each prison that houses only females.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Sterilization of Inmates [3440. - 3440.]

3440.

(a) Sterilization for the purpose of birth control, including, but not limited to, during labor and delivery, of an individual under the control of the department or a county and imprisoned in the state prison or a reentry facility, community correctional facility, county jail, or any other institution in which an individual is involuntarily confined or detained under a civil or criminal statute, is prohibited.

(b) Sterilization of an individual under the control of the department or a county and imprisoned in the state prison or a reentry facility, community correctional facility, county jail, or any other institution in which an individual is involuntarily confined or detained under a civil or criminal statute, through
 tubal ligation, hysterectomy, oophorectomy, salpingectomy, or any other means rendering an individual permanently incapable of reproducing, is prohibited except in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The procedure is required for the immediate preservation of the individual’s life in an emergency medical situation.

(2) The sterilizing procedure is medically necessary, as determined by contemporary standards of evidence-based medicine, to treat a diagnosed condition, and all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(A) Less invasive measures to address the medical need are nonexistent, are refused by the individual, or are first attempted and deemed unsuccessful by the individual, in consultation with his or her medical provider.

(B) A second
 physician, independent of, and not employed by, but authorized to provide services to individuals in the custody of, and to receive payment for those services from, the department or county department overseeing the confinement of the individual, conducts an in-person consultation with the individual and confirms the need for a medical intervention resulting in sterilization to address the medical need.

(C) Patient consent is obtained after the individual is made aware of the full and permanent impact the procedure will have on his or her reproductive capacity, that future medical treatment while under the control of the department or county will not be withheld should the individual refuse consent to the procedure, and the side effects of the procedure.

(c) If a sterilization procedure is performed pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), presterilization and
 poststerilization psychological consultation and medical followup, including providing relevant hormone therapy to address surgical menopause, shall be made available to the individual sterilized while under the control of the department or the county.

(d) (1) The department shall, if a sterilization procedure is performed on one or more individuals under its control, annually publish on its Internet Web site data related to the number of sterilizations performed, disaggregated by race, age, medical justification, and method of sterilization.

(2) (A) Each county jail or other institution of confinement shall, if a sterilization procedure is performed on one or more individuals under its control, annually submit to the Board of State and Community Corrections data related to the number of sterilizations performed, disaggregated by race,
 age, medical justification, and method of sterilization.

(B) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall annually publish the data received pursuant to subparagraph (A) on its Internet Web site.

(e) The department and all county jails or other institutions of confinement shall provide notification to all individuals under their custody and to all employees who are involved in providing health care services of their rights and responsibilities under this section.

(f) An employee of the department or of a county jail or other institution of confinement who reports the sterilization of an individual performed in violation of this section is entitled to the protection available under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6129, or under the California Whistleblower Protection Act
 (Article 3 (commencing with Section 8547) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or the Whistleblower Protection Act (Article 10 (commencing with Section 9149.20) of Chapter 1.5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 399.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2.05. Postrelease Community Supervision Act of 2011 [3450. - 3465.]

3450.

(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the Postrelease Community Supervision Act of 2011.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Legislature reaffirms its commitment to reducing recidivism among criminal offenders.

(2) Despite the dramatic increase in corrections spending over the past two decades, national reincarceration rates for people released from prison remain unchanged or have worsened. National data show that about 40 percent of released individuals are reincarcerated within three years. In California, the recidivism rate for persons who have served
 time in prison is even greater than the national average.

(3) Criminal justice policies that rely on the reincarceration of parolees for technical violations do not result in improved public safety.

(4) California must reinvest its criminal justice resources to support community corrections programs and evidence-based practices that will achieve improved public safety returns on this state’s substantial investment in its criminal justice system.

(5) Realigning the postrelease supervision of certain felons reentering the community after serving a prison term to local community corrections programs, which are strengthened through community-based punishment, evidence-based practices, and improved supervision strategies, will improve public safety outcomes among adult felon parolees and will facilitate their successful
 reintegration back into society.

(6) Community corrections programs require a partnership between local public safety entities and the county to provide and expand the use of community-based punishment for offenders paroled from state prison. Each county’s local Community Corrections Partnership, as established in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1230, should play a critical role in developing programs and ensuring appropriate outcomes for persons subject to postrelease community supervision.

(7) Fiscal policy and correctional practices should align to promote a justice reinvestment strategy that fits each county. “Justice reinvestment” is a data-driven approach to reduce corrections and related criminal justice spending and reinvest savings in strategies designed to increase public safety. The purpose of justice reinvestment is to manage and allocate criminal justice
 populations more cost effectively, generating savings that can be reinvested in evidence-based strategies that increase public safety while holding offenders accountable.

(8) “Community-based punishment” means evidence-based correctional sanctions and programming encompassing a range of custodial and noncustodial responses to criminal or noncompliant offender activity. Intermediate sanctions may be provided by local public safety entities directly or through public or private correctional service providers and include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Short-term “flash” incarceration in jail for a period of not more than 10 days.

(B) Intensive community supervision.

(C) Home detention with electronic monitoring or GPS monitoring.

(D) Mandatory community service.

(E) Restorative justice programs, such as mandatory victim restitution and victim-offender reconciliation.

(F) Work, training, or education in a furlough program pursuant to Section 1208.

(G) Work, in lieu of confinement, in a work release program pursuant to Section 4024.2.

(H) Day reporting.

(I) Mandatory residential or nonresidential substance abuse treatment programs.

(J) Mandatory random drug testing.

(K) Mother-infant care programs.

(L) Community-based residential programs offering structure, supervision, drug treatment, alcohol treatment, literacy programming, employment counseling, psychological counseling, mental health treatment, or any combination of these and other interventions.

(9) “Evidence-based practices” refers to supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices demonstrated by scientific research to reduce recidivism among individuals under probation, parole, or postrelease supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 27.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

3451.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and except for persons serving a prison term for any crime described in subdivision (b), all persons released from prison on and after October 1, 2011, or, whose sentence has been deemed served pursuant to Section 2900.5 after serving a prison term for a felony shall, upon release from prison and for a period not exceeding three years immediately following release, be subject to community supervision provided by the probation department of the county to which the person is being released, which is consistent with evidence-based practices, including, but not limited to, supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices demonstrated by scientific research to reduce recidivism among individuals under postrelease supervision.

(b) This section shall not apply to any person released from prison after having served a prison term for any of the following:

(1) A serious felony described in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(2) A violent felony described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(3) A crime for which the person was sentenced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 667 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1170.12.

(4) Any crime for which the person is classified as a high-risk sex offender.

(5) Any crime for which the person is required, as a condition of parole, to undergo treatment by the State Department of State
 Hospitals pursuant to Section 2962.

(c) (1) Postrelease supervision under this title shall be implemented by the county probation department according to a postrelease strategy designated by each county’s board of supervisors.

(2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall inform every prisoner subject to the provisions of this title, upon release from state prison, of the requirements of this title and of his or her responsibility to report to the county probation department. The department or probation department shall also inform persons serving a term of parole or postrelease community supervision for a felony offense who are subject to this section of the requirements of this title and of his or her responsibility to report to the county probation department. Thirty days prior to the release of any person subject to postrelease supervision by
 a county, the department shall notify the county of all information that would otherwise be required for parolees under subdivision (e) of Section 3003.

(d) A person released to postrelease community supervision pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, regardless of any subsequent determination that the person should have been released to parole pursuant to Section 3000.08, remain subject to subdivision (a) after having served 60 days under supervision pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 378, Sec. 5.   (AB 1156)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3452.

(a) A person who is eligible for postrelease community supervision pursuant to this title shall be given notice that he or she is subject to postrelease community supervision prior to his or her release from prison. A person who is on parole and is then transferred to postrelease community supervision shall be given notice that he or she is subject to postrelease community supervision prior to his or her release from state prison.

(b) A postrelease community supervision notice shall specify the following:

(1) The person’s release date and the maximum period the person may be subject to postrelease supervision under this title.

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of the county agency responsible for the person’s postrelease supervision.

(3) An advisement that if a person breaks the law or violates the conditions of release, he or she can be incarcerated in a county jail regardless of whether or not new charges are filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 50.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3453.

Postrelease community supervision shall include the following conditions:

(a) The person shall be informed of the conditions of release.

(b) The person shall obey all laws.

(c) The person shall report to the supervising county agency within two working days of release from custody.

(d) The person shall follow the directives and instructions of the supervising county agency.

(e) The person shall report to the supervising county agency as directed by that agency.

(f) The person, and their residence and possessions, shall be subject to search at any time of the day or night, with or without a warrant, by an agent of the supervising county agency or by a peace officer.

(g) The person shall waive extradition if found outside the state.

(h) (1) The person shall inform the supervising county agency of the person’s place of residence and shall notify the supervising county agency of any change in residence, or the establishment of a new residence if the person was previously transient, within five working days of the change.

(2) For purposes of this section, “residence” means one or more locations at
 which a person regularly resides, regardless of the number of days or nights spent there, such as a shelter or structure that can be located by a street address, including, but not limited to, a house, apartment building, motel, hotel, homeless shelter, and recreational or other vehicle. If the person has no residence, they shall inform the supervising county agency that they are transient.

(i) (1) The person shall inform the supervising county agency of the person’s place of employment, education, or training. The person shall inform the supervising agency of any pending or anticipated change in employment, education, or training.

(2) If the person enters into new employment, they shall inform the supervising county agency of the new employment within three business
 days of that entry.

(j) The person shall immediately inform the supervising county agency if they are arrested or receive a citation.

(k) The person shall obtain the permission of the supervising county agency to travel more than 50 miles from the person’s place of residence.

(l) The person shall obtain a travel pass from the supervising county agency before they may leave the county or state for more than two days.

(m) The person shall not be in the presence of a firearm or ammunition, or any item that appears to be a firearm or ammunition.

(n) The person shall not possess, use, or have access
 to any weapon listed in Section 16140, subdivision (c) of Section 16170, Section 16220, 16260, 16320, 16330, or 16340, subdivision (b) of Section 16460, Section 16470, subdivision (f) of Section 16520, or Section 16570, 16740, 16760, 16830, 16920, 16930, 16940, 17090, 17125, 17160, 17170, 17180, 17190, 17200, 17270, 17280, 17330, 17350, 17360, 17700, 17705, 17710, 17715, 17720, 17725, 17730, 17735, 17740, 17745, 19100, 19200, 19205, 20200, 20310, 20410, 20510, 20610, 20611, 20710, 20910, 21110, 21310, 21810, 22210, 22215, 22410, 24310, 24410, 24510, 24610, 24680, 24710, 30210, 30215, 31500, 32310, 32400, 32405, 32410, 32415, 32420, 32425, 32430 32435, 32440, 32445, 32450, 32900, 33215, 33220, 33225, or 33600.

(o) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and subdivision (p), the person shall not possess a knife
 with a blade longer than two inches.

(2) The person may possess a kitchen knife with a blade longer than two inches if the knife is used and kept only in the kitchen of the person’s residence.

(p) The person may use a knife with a blade longer than two inches, if the use is required for that person’s employment, the use has been approved in a document issued by the supervising county agency, and the person possesses the document of approval at all times and makes it available for inspection.

(q) The person shall waive any right to a court hearing prior to the imposition of a period of “flash incarceration” in a city or county jail of not more than 10 consecutive days for any violation of their postrelease
 supervision conditions.

(r) The person shall participate in rehabilitation programming as recommended by the supervising county agency.

(s) The person shall be subject to arrest with or without a warrant by a peace officer employed by the supervising county agency or, at the direction of the supervising county agency, by any peace officer when there is probable cause to believe the person has violated the terms and conditions of release.

(t) The person shall pay court-ordered restitution and restitution fines in the same manner as a person placed on probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 14.   (SB 827)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3454.

(a) Each supervising county agency, as established by the county board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3451, shall establish a review process for assessing and refining a person’s program of postrelease supervision. Any additional postrelease supervision conditions shall be reasonably related to the underlying offense for which the offender spent time in prison, or to the offender’s risk of recidivism, and the offender’s criminal history, and be otherwise consistent with law.

(b) Each county agency responsible for postrelease supervision, as established by the county board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3451, may determine additional appropriate conditions of supervision listed in
 Section 3453 consistent with public safety, including the use of continuous electronic monitoring as defined in Section 1210.7, order the provision of appropriate rehabilitation and treatment services, determine appropriate incentives, and determine and order appropriate responses to alleged violations, which can include, but shall not be limited to, immediate, structured, and intermediate sanctions up to and including referral to a reentry court pursuant to Section 3015, or flash incarceration in a city or county jail. Periods of flash incarceration are encouraged as one method of punishment for violations of an offender’s condition of postrelease supervision.

(c) As used in this title, “flash incarceration” is a period of detention in a city or county jail due to a violation of an offender’s conditions of postrelease supervision. The length of the detention period can range between one and 10 consecutive days. Flash incarceration is a tool
 that may be used by each county agency responsible for postrelease supervision. Shorter, but if necessary more frequent, periods of detention for violations of an offender’s postrelease supervision conditions shall appropriately punish an offender while preventing the disruption in a work or home establishment that typically arises from longer term revocations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 788, Sec. 3.   (AB 986)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3455.

(a) If the supervising county agency has determined, following application of its assessment processes, that intermediate sanctions as authorized in subdivision (b) of Section 3454 are not appropriate, the supervising county agency shall petition the court pursuant to Section 1203.2 to revoke, modify, or terminate postrelease community supervision. At any point during the process initiated pursuant to this section, a person may waive, in writing, his or her right to counsel, admit the violation of his or her postrelease community supervision, waive a court hearing, and accept the proposed modification of his or her postrelease community supervision. The petition shall include a written report that contains additional information regarding the petition, including the relevant terms and conditions of postrelease community
 supervision, the circumstances of the alleged underlying violation, the history and background of the violator, and any recommendations. The Judicial Council shall adopt forms and rules of court to establish uniform statewide procedures to implement this subdivision, including the minimum contents of supervision agency reports. Upon a finding that the person has violated the conditions of postrelease community supervision, the revocation hearing officer shall have authority to do all of the following:

(1) Return the person to postrelease community supervision with modifications of conditions, if appropriate, including a period of incarceration in a county jail.

(2) Revoke and terminate postrelease community supervision and order the person to confinement in
 a county jail.

(3) Refer the person to a reentry court pursuant to Section 3015 or other evidence-based program in the court’s discretion.

(b) (1) At any time during the period of postrelease community supervision, if a peace officer has probable cause to believe a person subject to postrelease community supervision is violating any term or condition of his or her release, the officer may, without a warrant or other process, arrest the person and bring him or her before the supervising county agency established by the county board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3451. Additionally, an officer employed by
 the supervising county agency may seek a warrant and a court or its designated hearing officer appointed pursuant to Section 71622.5 of the Government Code shall have the authority to issue a warrant for that person’s arrest.

(2) The court or its designated hearing officer shall have the authority to issue a warrant for a person who is the subject of a petition filed under this section who has failed to appear for a hearing on the petition or for any reason in the interests of justice, or to remand to custody a person who does appear at a hearing on the petition for any reason in the interests of justice.

(3) Unless a person subject to postrelease community supervision is otherwise serving a period of flash incarceration, whenever a person who is subject to this section is arrested, with or without a warrant or the filing of a petition for revocation, the court may order the release of the person under supervision from custody under any terms and conditions the court deems appropriate.

(c) The revocation hearing shall be held within a reasonable time after the filing of the revocation petition. Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), based upon a showing of a preponderance of the evidence that a person under supervision poses an unreasonable risk to public safety, or
 that the person may not appear if released from custody, or for any reason in the interests of justice, the supervising county agency shall have the authority to make a determination whether the person should remain in custody pending the first court appearance on a petition to revoke postrelease community supervision, and upon that determination, may order the person confined pending his or her first court appearance.

(d) Confinement pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall not exceed a period of 180 days in a county jail for each custodial sanction.

(e) A person shall not remain under supervision or in custody pursuant to this title on or
 after three years from the date of the person’s initial entry onto postrelease community supervision, except when his or her supervision is tolled pursuant to Section 1203.2 or subdivision (b) of Section 3456.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (SB 517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3456.
